Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1273.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 332.1 and 352(k) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are repealed:[Section 332.1. Electronic Payment.--Any payment in the 12345678910111213141516171819 amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more remitted to the department for the tax imposed under this article shall be remitted electronically as prescribed by the department. This section shall not apply to employer withholding payments under Part VII of this article and section 9 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as "The Fiscal Code."]Section 352. Additions, Penalties and Fees.--* * *[(k) If a tax payment is made and the payment does not comply with section 332.1 when required, the taxpayer that is liable for the tax shall, in addition to any other penalty, interest or addition provided by law, be liable for a penalty of three per cent of the payment remitted not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).]Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3003.26. Method of Payment.--F or a tax collected by the Department of Revenue in any taxable year, the Department of Revenue shall accept any and all forms of payment. The Treasury Department and the Department of Revenue shall not prescribe penalties for the use of any payment method.Section 3. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of section 3003.26 of the act.(2) Section 9(a)(1) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is repealed.Section 4. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with the provisions of this act.Section 5. The addition of section 3003.26 of the act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.20250HB1273PN1426 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 6. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1273PN1426 - 3 - 1